en: cardamom pod
da: hel kardemomme
de: kardamom ganz, Kardamon-Schote
hr: mahuna kardamoma
it: cardamomo in baccelli
sv: kardemummakapsel

en: cardamom seed, cardamom seeds
de: Kardamom-Samen, Kardamomsaat
fi: kardemumman siemen, kardemumman siemeniä
fr: graines de cardamome
hr: sjeme kardamoma
it: semi di cardamomo
nl: kardemomzaden, hele kardemomzaden

en: cinnamon
af: kaneel
am: ቀረፋ
ar: قرفة
az: darçın
be: карыца
bg: канела
bn: দারুচিনি
br: kanell
bs: cimet
ca: canyella
co: cannella
cs: skořice
cy: sinamon
da: kanel
de: zimt
dv: ފޮނި ތޮށި
el: κανέλλη, κανέλα
eo: cinamo
es: canela
et: kaneel
eu: kanela
fa: دارچین
fi: kaneli
fr: cannelle, canelle
fy: kaniel
ga: cainéal
gd: caineal
gl: canela
gu: તજ
he: קינמון
hi: दालचीनी
hr: cimet
hu: fahéj
hy: դարչին
id: kulit kayu manis
io: cinamo
is: kanill
it: cannella
ja: シナモン
jv: kayu manis
ka: დარიჩინი
kn: ದಾಲ್ಚಿನ್ನಿ
ko: 육계나무
ku: darçîn
la: cinnamum
lb: kanéil
li: keniel
lt: cinamonas
lv: kanēlis
mk: цимет
ml: കറുവ
mr: दालचिनी
ms: kayu manis
my: သစ်ကြံပိုးပင်
nb: kanel
ne: दालचिनी
nl: kaneel
nn: kanel
oc: canèla
or: ଡାଳଚିନି
pa: ਦਾਲਚੀਨੀ
pl: cynamon
pt: canela
qu: kanila sach'a
ro: scorțișoară
ru: корица
sa: वराङ्गम्
sd: دالچيني
sh: cimet
si: කුරුඳු
sk: škorica
sl: cimet
sq: kanella
sr: цимет
su: ki amis
sv: kanel
sw: mdalasini
ta: கறுவா
te: దాల్చిన చెక్క
th: อบเชย
tr: tarçın
uk: кориця
ur: دارچینی
vi: quế quan
vo: kirfat
yi: צימערינג
zh: 桂皮

en: cinnamon stick
fr: bâton de cannelle

en: cinnamon powder
bg: канела на прах
da: kanelpulver
de: Zimtpulver
es: canela en polvo
fi: kanelijauhe
fr: cannelle en poudre, cannelle moulue
hr: cimet u prahu
it: cannella in polvere
ja: シナモン粉末
nl: kaneelpoeder
pt: canela em pó
ru: корица молотая

en: cassia, chinese cinnamon
xx: cassia, cinnamomum cassia
am: ብርጕድ
ar: سليخة
az: çin darçın ağacı
bg: касия
cs: skořicovník čínský
de: Zimtkassie
el: κιννάμωμον η Κασσία
et: hiina kaneelipuu
fa: دارچین چینی
fi: kassiakaneli
fr: cannelle de Chine, cannelier de Chine
gu: દારચીની
hr: kineskog cimeta
id: kayu manis cina
is: kassía
ja: シナニッケイ
la: cinnamomum cassia, cinnamomum aromaticum
lt: kininis cinamonas
ml: ചൈനീസ് പട്ട
nb: kassiakanel
nl: cassie
pl: cynamonowiec wonny
pt: cássia-chinesa
ru: коричник китайский
sh: kineski cimet
sk: kineski cimet
sl: kitajski cimet
sv: kassiakanel
th: อบเชยจีน
uz: dolchin
za: naenggveiq
zh: 肉桂

en: ceylon cinnamon
bg: цейлонска канела
cs: skořice-Cejlon
de: Ceylon-Zimt
fi: ceyloninkaneli
fr: cannelle de ceylan
hr: cejlonski cimet
it: cannella di Ceylon
ko: 실론계피나무
la: cinnamomum verum
nl: Ceylonkaneel

en: clove
af: naeltjie
am: ቅርንፉድ
ar: قرنفل
as: লং
az: mixək
be: гваздзік
bg: карамфил
bn: লবঙ্গ
bo: ལི་ཤི།
bs: klinčić
ca: clavell d'espècia
co: viulaccia
cs: hřebíček
cv: гвоздика
da: kryddernellike, nellike
de: Nelke, Nelken, Gewürznelke, Gewürznelken
dv: ކަރަންފޫ
eo: kariofilo
es: clavos de olor, clavo
et: nelk
eu: iltze
fa: میخک صدپر
fi: mausteneilikka, neilikka
fr: girofle, clou de girofle, clous de girofle
ga: clóbh
gd: clo-mheas
gl: craveiro da india
gu: લવિંગ
he: ציפורן
hi: लौंग
hr: klinčić, klinčići, klinčić cijeli, cvjetne palice klinčića, syzygium aromaticum
ht: jiwòf
hu: szegfűszeg
id: cengkih
io: kariofilo
is: negull
it: chiodo di garofano, chiodi di garofano
ja: クローブ
jv: cengkèh
ka: მიხაკის ხე
kk: қалампыр ағашы
kn: ಲವಂಗ
ko: 정향나무
ku: mêxek
la: syzygium aromaticum
lb: neelcheskapp
li: groffelsnagel
lt: kvapnusis gvazdikmedis
lv: nagliņkoks
mk: каранфилче
ml: കരയാമ്പൂ
mr: लवंग
ms: cengkih
my: လေးညှင်းပင်
nb: kryddernellik
ne: ल्वाङ
nl: kruidnagel, kruidnagels
nn: nelliktre
oc: giròfle
or: ଲବଙ୍ଗ
pa: ਲੌਂਗ
pl: goździki, goździk, goździkowy, goździkowe, goździkowa, goździków
ps: لونګ
pt: cravo-da-índia
ro: cuișoare, cuisoare
ru: гвоздика
sa: लवङ्गम्
sh: klinčić
sk: klinčekovec voňavý
sl: nageljnove žbice
so: dhaga yare
sr: karanfilić
su: cengkéh
sv: kryddnejlika, nejlika
sw: karafuu, mkarafuu
ta: கிராம்பு
te: లవంగము
th: กานพลู
tr: karanfil
uk: гвоздика
ur: لونگ
vi: đinh hương
wa: djirofe
yi: נעגעלע
zh: 丁香

en: fenugreek
af: fenegriek
am: ኣብሽ
ar: حلبة
as: মেথি
az: güldəfnə
bg: сминдух
bn: মেথি
bo: ཤུ་མོ་ཟ་
ca: fenigrec
cs: pískavice
cy: ffenigrig
da: bukkehorn
de: bockshornklee
dv: އޯބަތް
el: τριγωνίσκος
eo: fenugreko
es: fenogreco, alholva
eu: ailorbe
fa: شنبلیله
fi: sarviapila
fr: fenugrec
ga: seamair ghréagach
gl: alforfa
gu: મેથી
he: גרגרנית יוונית
hi: मेथी
hr: piskavica
hu: görögszéna
hy: շամբալա
id: kelabat
it: fieno greco
ja: フェヌグリーク
jv: kelabat
ka: უცხო სუნელი
kn: ಮೆಂತೆ
ko: 큰노랑꽃자리풀
ku: şembelîk
la: trigonella foenum-graecum
mk: пискавица
ml: ഉലുവ
mr: मेथी
ms: halba
mt: fienu, ħelba
nb: bukkehornkløver, bukkehornskløver
ne: मेथी
nl: fenegriek
or: ମେଥି
pa: ਮੇਥੀ
pl: kozieradka, kozieradki
ps: ملخوزه
pt: feno-grego, fenacho, alforva
ro: schinduf
ru: пажитник сенной
sa: मेथिका
sd: ھرٻو
si: උළුහාල්
sk: senovka grécka
sl: grško seno, triplat
so: xulbad
sr: пискавица
sv: bockhornsklöver
ta: வெந்தயம்
te: మెంతులు
th: ลูกซัด
tr: çemen otu
uk: гуньба сінна
ur: میتھی
vi: cỏ ca ri
yi: באקסהארן
zh: 胡芦巴

en: fenugreek leaf, fenugreek leaves
de: Bockshornkleeblatt, Bockshornkleeblätter
es: hoja de fenegreco
fi: sarviapilan lehdet
fr: feuille de fenugrec
hr: list piskavice
it: foglie di trigonella
nl: fenegriekblad

en: dried fenugreek leaf
es: hoja de fenegreco seca
fi: kuivatut sarviapilan lehdet
fr: feuille de fenugrec séchée
hr: osušeni list piskavice
it: foglie di fieno greco essiccate
nl: gedroogd fenegriekblad

en: fenugreek seed, fenugreek seeds
ca: llavor de fenigrec
da: bukkehornsfrø
de: Bockshornkleesamen, Bockshornkleesaat
el: σπόρος τριγωνέλλας, σπόρος μοσχοσίταρου
es: semilla de fenegreco, semilla de alholva
fi: sarviapilan siemen, sarviapilan siemenet
fr: graine de fenugrec, graines de fenugrec
hr: sjeme piskavice
it: seme di fieno greco, semi di fieno greco
la: Trigonellae foenugraeci semen
nl: fenegriekzaad
pl: nasiona kozieradki, nasiono kozieradki
sv: bockhornsklöverfrö

en: blue fenugreek
be: пажытнік блакітны
bg: син сминдух
de: Schabzigerklee
el: τριγωνέλλα η κυανή
eo: blua trigonelo
es: meliloto azul
et: sinine lambalääts
fi: sinisarviapila
fr: trèfle mélilot, fenugrec bleu, trèfle bleu
hr: plava piskavica
it: fieno greco blu
ko: 청호로파
la: trigonella caerulea, trigonella melilotus-caerulea
nl: zevengetijdenklaver
pl: kozieradka błękitna
ru: пажитник голубой
sv: blåväppling
tr: mavi çemenotu

en: Galangal
de: Galgant
es: galangal
fi: galangal, galanga, galgantti, galangajuuri
fr: galanga
hr: galangal
hu: galangál
is: galgantrót
it: galanga
ja: ガランガル
ko: 고량강
nl: galanga, galangawortel
pl: galangal
pt: galangal
ru: калган
sv: galanga
zh: 高良薑

en: black galangal
de: schwarzer Galgant
it: galanga nera

en: ginger, stem ginger, ginger root
af: Gemmer
ak: kakadro, Kakaduro
am: ዝንጅብል
ar: زنجبيل
az: Zəncəfil
be: Імбір
bg: джинджифил
bi: Giner
bn: আদা
bo: བཅའ་ལྒ།
br: Jinjebr
bs: Đumbir
ca: gingebre
cs: zázvor, zázvorová, zázvoru
cy: Sinsir
da: ingefær, ingefær rod
de: Ingwer
el: Πιπερόριζα, ζιγγίβερι
eo: zingibro
es: Gengibre, jengibre
et: Ingver, ingveri
eu: jengibre
fa: زنجبیل
fi: inkivääri, inkiväärinjuuri, inkivääriä
fr: gingembre, racine de gingembre
ga: Sinséar
gd: Dinnsear
gl: Sinxebra
gu: આદુ
he: זנגביל
hi: अदरक
hr: đumbir, đumbira, korijen đumbira
ht: jenjanm
hu: gyömbér
hy: կոճապղպեղ
id: jahe
io: Jinjero
is: Engifer
it: zenzero
ja: ショウガ, しょうが, 生姜, ジンジャー
jv: Jaé
ka: ჯანჯაფილი
kk: Жанжабіл, Зімбір
kn: ಶುಂಠಿ
ko: 생강
ku: Zencefîl
kv: Имбирь
la: Zingiber officinale, Gingiber
lg: Ennyingo Okuzimba
li: Geimer
ln: Ntángawisi
lt: Tikrasis imbieras, imbiero
lv: ingvers, ingvera
mk: ѓумбир
ml: ഇഞ്ചി
mr: आले
ms: Halia
mt: ġinġer
my: ချင်းပင်
nb: ingefær, ingefærrot
ne: अदुवा
nl: gember, gemberwortel
nn: ingefær
oc: Gengibre
or: ଅଦା
pa: ਅਦਰਕ
pl: Imbir lekarski, imbir, korzeń imbiru, imbiru
ps: سونډی
pt: Gengibre
qu: Awirinri
ro: Ghimbir, ghimbirului
ru: Имбирь, корень имбиря свежий
sa: आर्द्रकम्
sd: ادرڪ
sh: Đumbir
sk: Ďumbier, zázvor
sl: Ingver
sr: ћумбир
su: Jahé
sv: ingefära, ingefärs
sw: Mtangawizi
ta: இஞ்சி
te: అల్లం
tg: Занҷабил
th: ขิง
tl: Luya
tr: zencefil
ty: Rea tinito
ug: زەنجىۋىل
uk: імбир
ur: ادرک
uz: Zanjabil
vi: Gừng
vo: Ingviir
wo: jinjeer
yi: אינגבער
za: hing
zh: 薑

en: ginger powder, ground ginger
bg: джинджифил на прах
da: malen ingefær
de: gemahlener Ingwer, Ingwerpulver
es: Gengibre en polvo, polvo de gengibre, jengibre en polvo
fi: inkiväärijauhe, jauhettu inkivääri
fr: gingembre moulu
hr: prah mljevenog đumbira
it: zenzero macinato
nb: malen ingefær
nl: gemberpoeder, gemalen gember, gemalen gemberwortel, djahé
pl: mielony imbir
pt: Gengibre em pó
sv: ingefärapulver, malen ingefära

en: ginger paste
de: Ingwerpaste
fi: inkivääritahna
fr: Pâte de gingembre
hr: pasta od đumbira
it: pasta di zenzero
pl: pasta imbirowa

en: ginger extract
bg: екстракт от джинджифил
fr: extrait de gingembre, l'extrait de gingembre
hr: ekstrakt đumbira
it: estratto di zenzero
pl: ekstrakt z imbiru, ekstrakt imbiru
sv: ingefärsextrakt

en: ginger syrup
it: sciroppo di zenzero
nl: gembersiroop